Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 27.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-885.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:

(1) Real estate means and includes condominiums and leaseholds,
as well as any other interest or estate in land, whether corporeal, incorporeal,
freehold, or nonfreehold, and whether the real estate is situated in this
state or elsewhere;

(2) Broker means any person who, for any form of compensation
or consideration or with the intent or expectation of receiving the same from
another, negotiates or attempts to negotiate the listing, sale, purchase,
exchange, rent, lease, or option for any real estate or improvements thereon,
or assists in procuring prospects or holds himself or herself out as a referral
agent for the purpose of securing prospects for the listing, sale, purchase,
exchange, renting, leasing, or optioning of any real estate or collects rents
or attempts to collect rents, gives a broker's price opinion or comparative
market analysis, or holds himself or herself out as engaged in any of the
foregoing. Broker also includes any person: (a) Employed, by or on behalf
of the owner or owners of lots or other parcels of real estate, for any form
of compensation or consideration to sell such real estate or any part thereof
in lots or parcels or make other disposition thereof; (b) who auctions, offers,
attempts, or agrees to auction real estate; or (c) who buys or offers to buy
or sell or otherwise deals in options to buy real estate;

(3) Associate broker means a person who has a broker's license
and who is employed by another broker to participate in any activity described
in subdivision (2) of this section;

(4) Designated broker means an individual holding a broker's
license who has full authority to conduct the real estate activities of a
real estate business. In a sole proprietorship, the owner, or broker identified
by the owner, shall be the designated broker. In the event the owner identifies
the designated broker, the owner shall file a statement with the commission
subordinating to the designated broker full authority to conduct the real
estate activities of the sole proprietorship. In a partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation, the partners, limited liability company members,
or board of directors shall identify the designated broker for its real estate
business by filing a statement with the commission subordinating to the designated
broker full authority to conduct the real estate activities of the partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation. The designated broker shall also
be responsible for supervising the real estate activities of any associate
brokers or salespersons;

(5) Inactive broker means an associate broker whose license
has been returned to the commission by the licensee's broker, a broker who
has requested the commission to place the license on inactive status, a new
licensee who has failed to designate an employing broker or have the license
issued as an individual broker, or a broker whose license has been placed
on inactive status under statute, rule, or regulation;

(6) Salesperson means any person, other than an associate
broker, who is employed by a broker to participate in any activity described
in subdivision (2) of this section;

(7) Inactive salesperson means a salesperson whose license
has been returned to the commission by the licensee's broker, a salesperson
who has requested the commission to place the license on inactive status,
a new licensee who has failed to designate an employing broker, or a salesperson
whose license has been placed on inactive status under statute, rule, or regulation;

(8) Person means and includes individuals, corporations,
partnerships, and limited liability companies, except that when referring
to a person licensed under the act, it means an individual;

(9) Subdivision or subdivided land means any real estate
offered for sale and which has been registered under the Interstate Land Sales
Full Disclosure Act, 82 Stat. 590 and following, 15 U.S.C. 1701 and following,
as such act existed on January 1, 1973, or real estate located out of this
state which is divided or proposed to be divided into twenty-five or more
lots, parcels, or units;

(10) Subdivider means any person who causes land to be subdivided
into a subdivision for himself, herself, or others or who undertakes to develop
a subdivision but does not include a public agency or officer authorized by
law to create subdivisions;

(11) Purchaser means a person who acquires or attempts to
acquire or succeeds to an interest in land;

(12) Commission means the State Real Estate Commission;

(13) Broker's price opinion means an analysis, opinion, or
conclusion prepared by a person licensed under the Nebraska Real Estate License
Act in the ordinary course of his or her business relating to the price of
specified interests in or aspects of identified real estate or identified
real property for the purpose of (a) listing,
purchase, or sale or (b) originating,
extending, renewing, or modifying a loan in a transaction other than a federally
related transaction;

(14) Comparative market analysis means an analysis, opinion,
or conclusion prepared by a person licensed under the act in the ordinary
course of his or her business relating to the price of specified interests
in or aspects of identified real estate or identified real property by comparison
to other real property currently or recently in the marketplace for the purpose
of (a) listing,
purchase, or sale or (b) originating,
extending, renewing, or modifying a loan in a transaction other than a federally
related transaction;

(15) Distance education means courses in which instruction
does not take place in a traditional classroom setting, but rather through
other media by which instructor and student are separated by distance and
sometimes by time;

(16) Regulatory jurisdiction means a state, district, or
territory of the United States, a province of Canada or a foreign country,
or a political subdivision of a foreign country, which has implemented and
administers laws regulating the activities of a broker;

(17) Federal financial
institution regulatory agency means (a) the Board of Governors of the Federal
Reserve System, (b) the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, (c) the Office
of the Comptroller of the Currency, (d) the Office of Thrift Supervision,
(e) the National Credit Union Administration, or (f) the successors of any
of those agencies; and

(18)
Federally related transaction means a real-estate-related transaction that
(a) requires the services of an appraiser and (b) is engaged in, contracted
for, or regulated by a federal financial institution regulatory agency.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 68, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 118, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 529;

Laws 1999, LB 618, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB26, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 27.

One of the enumerated activities covered by section 76-2422(6) is the exchange of property, based on the plain language of subsdivision (2) of this section. McCully, Inc. v. Baccaro Ranch, 279 Neb. 443, 778 N.W.2d 115 (2010).

Pursuant to the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, any person collecting a fee or commission on the sale of real estate must be a licensed real estate broker or salesperson unless they meet one of the exceptions provided in the act. In re Estate of Ronan, 277 Neb. 516, 763 N.W.2d 704 (2009).

"Business brokers" are real estate brokers, as defined by this section, if the attempted sale or lease involves the transfer of any interest in real estate. Ford v. American Medical International, 228 Neb. 226, 422 N.W.2d 67 (1988).